Nevada, session 83, SB113.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 482.3833 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
482.3833 “Person with a disability of moderate duration”
means a person:
1. With a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk;
and
2. Whose disability has been certified by a licensed physician,
physician assistant , [or] advanced practice registered nurse ,
occupational therapist or physical therapist as being reversible, but
estimated to last longer than 6 months.
Sec. 2. NRS 482.3837 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.3837 1. “Person with a permanent disability” means a
person:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(a) With a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk;
and
(b) Whose disability has been certified by a licensed physician,
physician assistant , [or] advanced practice registered nurse ,
occupational therapist or physical therapist as irreversible.
2. The term includes a person with a qualifying service-
connected disability, as that term is defined in subsection 1 or 2 of
NRS 482.0962.
Sec. 3. NRS 482.3839 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.3839 “Person with a temporary disability” means a person:
1. With a disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk;
and
2. Whose disability has been certified by a licensed physician,
physician assistant , [or] advanced practice registered nurse ,
occupational therapist or physical therapist as estimated to last not
longer than 6 months.
Sec. 4. NRS 482.384 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.384 1. Upon the application of a person with a
permanent disability, the Department may issue special license
plates for a vehicle, including a motorcycle or moped, registered by
the applicant pursuant to this chapter. The application must include
a statement from a licensed physician, physician assistant , [or]
advanced practice registered nurse , occupational therapist or
physical therapist certifying that the applicant is a person with a
permanent disability or a certificate from the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the United States Department of
Defense which indicates the applicant has incurred a qualifying
service-connected disability, as that term is defined in subsection 1
or 2 of NRS 482.0962, as applicable. The issuance of a special
license plate to a person with a permanent disability pursuant to this
subsection does not preclude the issuance to such a person of a
special parking placard for a vehicle other than a motorcycle or
moped or a special parking sticker for a motorcycle or moped
pursuant to subsection 6.
2. Every year after the initial issuance of special license plates
to a person with a permanent disability, the Department shall require
the person to renew the special license plates in accordance with the
procedures for renewal of registration pursuant to this chapter. The
Department shall not require a person with a permanent disability to
include with the application for renewal a statement from a licensed
physician, physician assistant , [or] advanced practice registered
nurse , occupational therapist or physical therapist certifying that
the person is a person with a permanent disability or a certificate
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the United
States Department of Defense which indicates the applicant has
incurred a qualifying service-connected disability, as that term is
defined in subsection 1 or 2 of NRS 482.0962, as applicable.
3. Upon the application of an organization which provides
transportation for a person with a permanent disability, disability of
moderate duration or temporary disability, the Department may
issue special license plates for a vehicle registered by the
organization pursuant to this chapter, or the Department may issue
special parking placards to the organization pursuant to this section
to be used on vehicles providing transportation to such persons. The
application must include a statement from the organization
certifying that:
(a) The vehicle for which the special license plates are issued is
used primarily to transport persons with permanent disabilities,
disabilities of moderate duration or temporary disabilities; or
(b) The organization which is issued the special parking
placards will only use such placards on vehicles that actually
transport persons with permanent disabilities, disabilities of
moderate duration or temporary disabilities.
4. The Department may charge a fee for special license plates
issued pursuant to this section not to exceed the fee charged for the
issuance of license plates for the same class of vehicle.
5. Special license plates issued pursuant to this section must
display the international symbol of access in a color which contrasts
with the background and is the same size as the numerals and letters
on the plate.
6. Upon the application of a person with a permanent disability
or disability of moderate duration, the Department may issue:
(a) A special parking placard for a vehicle other than a
motorcycle or moped. Upon request, the Department may issue one
additional placard to an applicant to whom special license plates
have not been issued pursuant to this section.
(b) A special parking sticker for a motorcycle or moped.
 The application must include a statement from a licensed
physician, physician assistant , [or] advanced practice registered
nurse , occupational therapist or physical therapist certifying that
the applicant is a person with a permanent disability or disability of
moderate duration or a certificate from the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the United States Department of
Defense which indicates the applicant has incurred a qualifying
service-connected disability, as that term is defined in subsection 1
or 2 of NRS 482.0962, as applicable.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
7. A special parking placard issued pursuant to subsection 6
must:
(a) Have inscribed on it the international symbol of access
which is at least 3 inches in height, is centered on the placard and is
white on a blue background;
(b) Have an identification number and date of expiration of:
(1) If the special parking placard is issued to a person with a
permanent disability, 10 years after the initial date of issuance; or
(2) If the special parking placard is issued to a person with a
disability of moderate duration, 2 years after the initial date of
issuance;
(c) Have placed or inscribed on it the seal or other identification
of the Department; and
(d) Have a form of attachment which enables a person using the
placard to display the placard from the rearview mirror of the
vehicle.
8. A special parking sticker issued pursuant to subsection 6
must:
(a) Have inscribed on it the international symbol of access
which complies with any applicable federal standards, is centered on
the sticker and is white on a blue background;
(b) Have an identification number and a date of expiration of:
(1) If the special parking sticker is issued to a person with a
permanent disability, 10 years after the initial date of issuance; or
(2) If the special parking sticker is issued to a person with a
disability of moderate duration, 2 years after the initial date of
issuance; and
(c) Have placed or inscribed on it the seal or other identification
of the Department.
9. Before the date of expiration of a special parking placard or
special parking sticker issued to a person with a permanent
disability or disability of moderate duration, the person shall renew
the special parking placard or special parking sticker. If the
applicant for renewal is a person with a disability of moderate
duration, the applicant must include with the application for renewal
a statement from a licensed physician, physician assistant , [or]
advanced practice registered nurse , occupational therapist or
physical therapist certifying that the applicant is a person with a
disability which limits or impairs the ability to walk, and that such
disability, although not irreversible, is estimated to last longer than 6
months. A person with a permanent disability is not required to
submit evidence of a continuing disability with the application for
renewal.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
10. The Department, or a city or county, may issue, and charge
a reasonable fee for, a temporary parking placard for a vehicle other
than a motorcycle or moped or a temporary parking sticker for a
motorcycle or moped upon the application of a person with a
temporary disability. Upon request, the Department, city or county
may issue one additional temporary parking placard to an applicant.
The application must include a certificate from a licensed physician,
physician assistant , [or] advanced practice registered nurse ,
occupational therapist or physical therapist indicating:
(a) That the applicant has a temporary disability; and
(b) The estimated period of the disability.
11. A temporary parking placard issued pursuant to subsection
10 must:
(a) Have inscribed on it the international symbol of access
which is at least 3 inches in height, is centered on the placard and is
white on a red background;
(b) Have an identification number and a date of expiration; and
(c) Have a form of attachment which enables a person using the
placard to display the placard from the rearview mirror of the
vehicle.
12. A temporary parking sticker issued pursuant to subsection
10 must:
(a) Have inscribed on it the international symbol of access
which is at least 3 inches in height, is centered on the sticker and is
white on a red background; and
(b) Have an identification number and a date of expiration.
13. A temporary parking placard or temporary parking sticker
is valid only for the period for which a physician, physician assistant
, [or] advanced practice registered nurse , occupational therapist or
physical therapist has certified the disability, but in no case longer
than 6 months. If the temporary disability continues after the period
for which the physician, physician assistant , [or] advanced practice
registered nurse , occupational therapist or physical therapist has
certified the disability, the person with the temporary disability must
renew the temporary parking placard or temporary parking sticker
before the temporary parking placard or temporary parking sticker
expires. The person with the temporary disability shall include with
the application for renewal a statement from a licensed physician,
physician assistant , [or] advanced practice registered nurse ,
occupational therapist or physical therapist certifying that the
applicant continues to be a person with a temporary disability and
the estimated period of the disability.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
14. A special or temporary parking placard must be displayed
in the vehicle when the vehicle is parked by hanging or attaching the
placard to the rearview mirror of the vehicle. If the vehicle has no
rearview mirror, the placard must be placed on the dashboard of the
vehicle in such a manner that the placard can easily be seen from
outside the vehicle when the vehicle is parked.
15. Upon issuing a special license plate pursuant to subsection
1, a special or temporary parking placard, or a special or temporary
parking sticker, the Department, or the city or county, if applicable,
shall issue a letter to the applicant that sets forth the name and
address of the person with a permanent disability, disability of
moderate duration or temporary disability to whom the special
license plate, special or temporary parking placard or special or
temporary parking sticker has been issued and:
(a) If the person receives special license plates, the license plate
number designated for the plates; and
(b) If the person receives a special or temporary parking placard
or a special or temporary parking sticker, the identification number
and date of expiration indicated on the placard or sticker.
 The letter, or a legible copy thereof, must be kept with the vehicle
for which the special license plate has been issued or in which the
person to whom the special or temporary parking placard or special
or temporary parking sticker has been issued is driving or is a
passenger.
16. A special or temporary parking sticker must be affixed to
the windscreen of the motorcycle or moped. If the motorcycle or
moped has no windscreen, the sticker must be affixed to any other
part of the motorcycle or moped which may be easily seen when the
motorcycle or moped is parked.
17. Special or temporary parking placards, special or
temporary parking stickers, or special license plates issued pursuant
to this section do not authorize parking in any area on a highway
where parking is prohibited by law.
18. No person, other than the person certified as being a person
with a permanent disability, disability of moderate duration or
temporary disability, or a person actually transporting such a person,
may use the special license plate or plates or a special or temporary
parking placard, or a special or temporary parking sticker issued
pursuant to this section to obtain any special parking privileges
available pursuant to this section.
19. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection 18 is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
20. The Department may review the eligibility of each holder
of a special parking placard, a special parking sticker or special
license plates, or any combination thereof. Upon a determination of
ineligibility by the Department, the holder shall surrender the
special parking placard, special parking sticker or special license
plates, or any combination thereof, to the Department.
21. For the purposes of this section, a statement or certificate
from a licensed physician, physician assistant, advanced practice
registered nurse, occupational therapist or physical therapist may
be a statement or certificate which is completed by an agent or
employee at the direction and under the supervision of a licensed
physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse,
occupational therapist or physical therapist, provided that any
medical determination therein has been made by the licensed
physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse,
occupational therapist or physical therapist.
22. The Department may adopt such regulations as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)